Arkansas, session 2025, SB390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-50-503(c)(2), concerning the
responsibility for the selection of industries and occupations related to
work-based training programs, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The division, the Arkansas Apprenticeship Coordination
Steering Committee, the Office of Skills Development, and local sites shall
take joint responsibility for identifying the industries and occupations
selected in subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 52, Subchapter 2, is
repealed.
Subchapter 2 — Apprenticeship Training Programs

6-52-201. Definitions.
In this subchapter:
(1) “Apprenticeship training program” means a training program that
provides on-the-job training, supplementary instruction, or related
instruction in a trade or occupation that has been certified as an
apprenticeable occupation by the United States Office of Apprenticeship;
*CRH201*
03-18-2025 10:36:37 CRH201

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB390
(2)(A) “Pre-apprenticeship” means programs that provide
instruction or training to increase math, literacy, and other vocational and
prevocational skills needed to enter a registered apprenticeship program.
(B) “Pre-apprenticeship” programs are not:
(i) Registered with the United States Department of
Labor during the term of the pre-apprenticeship training; or
(ii) Federally vetted, but a high-quality pre-
apprenticeship should have a minimum of one (1) registered apprenticeship
partner or a strong relationship with at least one (1) apprenticeship
program, feature training and curriculum that aligns with that program, and
include a wide range of support services designed specifically to help
participants succeed;
(3) “Program sponsor” means any person, association, committee,
business, or organization operating an apprenticeship program and in whose
name the program is registered or is in the process of registration by the
United States Office of Apprenticeship;
(4) “Related instruction” means organized off-the-job
instruction in theoretical or technical subjects required for the completion
of an apprenticeship program for a particular apprenticeable trade;
(5) “Supplementary instruction” means a course of instruction
for persons employed as journeymen craftsmen in an apprenticeable trade that
is designed to provide new skills or upgrade current skills; and
(6) “Youth apprenticeship” means a registered apprenticeship
program that has been validated by the United States Department of Labor or a
state apprenticeship agency serving individuals between sixteen (16) and
twenty-four (24) years of age and is sponsored by employers, labor management
organizations, or other organizations.

6-52-202. Applicability.
The provisions of this subchapter apply only to those apprenticeship
training programs which receive state funds pursuant to the provisions of §
6-52-207.

6-52-203. Rules.
The Office of Skills Development and the Arkansas Apprenticeship
Coordination Steering Committee shall promulgate rules necessary to implement
03-18-2025 10:36:37 CRH201

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB390
the provisions of this subchapter.

6-52-204. Arkansas Apprenticeship Coordination Steering Committee.
(a)(1) The Governor shall appoint an Arkansas Apprenticeship
Coordination Steering Committee composed of members with the following
qualifications:
(A) One (1) member representing employer organizations;
(B) One (1) member representing labor unions or bargaining
agents for members of apprenticeable trades;
(C) One (1) member representing the minority and female
workforce who have knowledge of apprenticeship and are familiar with the
needs of vocational and technical education;
(D) Two (2) members who teach or immediately supervise
supplementary instruction or related instruction courses;
(E) Three (3) members representing employers who are
actively utilizing registered apprenticeship who have knowledge of
apprenticeship and are familiar with the needs of vocational and technical
education;
(F) One (1) member representing the Division of Career and
Technical Education who has knowledge of apprenticeship and is familiar with
the needs of vocational and technical education;
(G) One (1) member representing a state supported two-year
or four-year institution of higher education who has knowledge of
apprenticeship and is familiar with the needs of vocational and technical
education;
(H) One (1) member representing the Arkansas Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act, § 15-4-3701 et seq., workforce system who has
knowledge of apprenticeship and is familiar with the needs of vocational and
technical education; and
(I) One (1) member representing the Office of Skills
Development.
(2) Members of the committee shall serve terms of four (4)
years.
(3) Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired portion of a
term vacated.
(4) The Governor shall consult the Office of Skills Development
03-18-2025 10:36:37 CRH201

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB390
before making an appointment under this subsection.
(5) Appointments made by the Governor under this subsection
shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(b) Advisory members of the committee shall include the following:
(1) Two (2) persons designated by the Office of Skills
Development; and
(2) One (1) person designated by and representing the United
States Office of Apprenticeship.

6-52-205. Arkansas Apprenticeship Coordination Steering Committee —
Duties.
(a) The Arkansas Apprenticeship Coordination Steering Committee shall
recommend to the Career Education and Workforce Development Board a statewide
plan for the development of a comprehensive program of apprenticeship
training that shall include but not be limited to the following:
(1) Formulas and administrative procedures to be used in
requesting appropriations of state funds for apprenticeship training and
apprenticeship expansion efforts;
(2) Forms, formulas, and administrative procedures to be used in
distributing available funds to apprenticeship training programs and
apprenticeship expansion efforts; and
(3) The content and method of the public notice required by this
subchapter.
(b)(1) The Office of Skills Development shall furnish the committee
with the current data necessary to develop the plan.
(2) All state boards and agencies shall cooperate with the
committee and shall furnish information and material on request.
(c) Pursuant to this section, the reporting procedures shall be
included in the state plan for apprenticeship.

6-52-206. Recommendations.
(a) Recommendations of the Arkansas Apprenticeship Coordination
Steering Committee submitted to the Office of Skills Development must be
acted on and either accepted or rejected.
(b) A recommendation which is rejected must be returned immediately to
the committee, accompanied by written notice of the reasons for rejecting the
03-18-2025 10:36:37 CRH201

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB390
recommendation.

6-52-207. Training programs generally.
(a) Under this subchapter, the Director of the Office of Skills
Development shall allocate state funds for the support of apprenticeship
training programs that meet the criteria stated in this subchapter.
(b) An apprenticeship training program may be cosponsored by a public
school district, an education service cooperative, a state postsecondary
institution, a vocational-technical school, or a two-year community college
pursuant to a contract between the district or institution and an
apprenticeship program sponsor.
(c) An apprenticeship training program shall be under the direction of
an apprenticeship coordinator appointed by an apprenticeship program sponsor
who shall perform the duties stated in § 6-52-208.
(d)(1) Each apprentice participating in an apprenticeship training
program shall be given a written apprenticeship agreement by an
apprenticeship program sponsor stating the standards and conditions of his or
her employment and training.
(2) The apprenticeship agreements are furnished by the United
States Office of Apprenticeship.
(e)(1) An apprentice shall not be charged tuition or fees by a public
school district or state postsecondary institution.
(2)(A) However, an administrative fee may be charged to cover
the costs of processing the records of an apprentice.
(B) The fee allowed under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this
section shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each course in
which the apprentice is enrolled.
(3) The apprentice or an apprenticeship program sponsor may be
required to furnish books and special equipment.
(f)(1) Funding for an apprenticeship training program, in addition to
any other money available, shall be based on:
(A) Allocation of funds to an apprenticeship program
sponsor by the Office of Skills Development, as referred to in subsection (a)
of this section; or
(B) Terms of a contract between an apprenticeship program
sponsor and a cosponsor, as referred to in subsection (b) of this section.
03-18-2025 10:36:37 CRH201

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB390
(2) An apprenticeship program sponsor may charge an apprentice
or the employer of the apprentice tuition and fees to cover administrative
costs incurred while the apprentice is registered with the apprenticeship
program sponsor.
(g) The terms of the contract referred to in subsection (b) of this
section shall require without limitation the following in order to
effectively administer the apprenticeship training program in a manner
consistent with the public's need for skilled workers and the apprentice's
need for marketable skills in apprenticeable occupations:
(1) Adequate facilities;
(2) Personnel; and
(3) Resources.
(h) An apprenticeship training program shall be registered with the
United States Office of Apprenticeship and the Office of Skills Development.

6-52-208. Duties of apprenticeship program sponsors.
(a) The apprenticeship program sponsor of each apprenticeship training
program shall:
(1) Establish standards and goals for supplementary instruction
and related instruction for apprentices in the program;
(2) Establish rules governing the on-the-job training and other
instruction for apprentices in the program;
(3) Plan and organize instructional materials designed to
provide technical and theoretical knowledge and basic skills required by
apprentices in the program;
(4) Recommend qualified instructors for the program;
(5) Monitor and evaluate the performance and progress of each
apprentice in the program and the program as a whole; and
(6) Interview applicants and select those most qualified for
entrance into the program.
(b) A program must provide for the keeping of records of the on-the-
job training and progress of each apprentice.
(c) A program must require instructors to maintain recommended
qualifications.
(d) A program must perform any other duties which promote the goals of
individual apprentices and of the program as a whole.
03-18-2025 10:36:37 CRH201

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB390
(e)(1) An apprenticeship program sponsor shall provide the names of
the employers who enroll apprentices into the program to the Office of Skills
Development on or before September 1 of each fiscal year.
(2) The office shall not publish the names of the employers who
have enrolled apprentices, nor use the employer names for a purpose other
than program administration and research, unless approved by the employer.
(3) The names of employers provided by apprenticeship program
sponsors under this subsection shall be exempt from the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 52, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 3 — State Apprenticeship Agency Act

6-52-301. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "State
Apprenticeship Agency Act".

6-52-302. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Apprentice" means a worker who is:
(A) At least sixteen (16) years of age; and
(B) Employed to learn an apprenticeable occupation or
trade as defined in 29 C.F.R. § 29.4;
(2) "Apprenticeship" means a program for the recruitment,
selection, employment, and training of apprentices that is developed under 29
C.F.R. §§ 29 and 30 and the rules of the State Apprenticeship Agency;
(3) "Apprenticeship agreement" means a written agreement between
an apprentice and a sponsor that contains the terms and conditions of the
apprentice's employment and training consistent with 29 C.F.R. § 29.7 and
this subchapter;
(4) "Cancellation" means the termination of:
(A) The registration of a pre-apprenticeship or
apprenticeship at the request of the sponsor; or
(B) An apprenticeship agreement at the request of the
apprentice;
03-18-2025 10:36:37 CRH201

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB390
(5) "Deregistration" means the termination of the registration
of a pre-apprenticeship or apprenticeship by the State Apprenticeship Agency;
(6) "Employer" means a person employing an apprentice;
(7) "On-the-job training" means training that is:
(A) Provided to a paid apprentice who is engaged in
productive work in an occupation when the work provides knowledge or skills
essential to the full and adequate performance of the occupation; and
(B) Limited in duration as appropriate to the occupation
for which the apprentice is being trained based on the content of the
training and the apprentice's prior work experience;
(8) "Pre-apprenticeship" means a program or set of services
recognized by the State Apprenticeship Agency for state purposes, in
partnership with a registered apprenticeship program, designed to prepare
individuals to enter and succeed in a registered apprenticeship program;
(9)(A) "Related technical instruction" means an organized and
systematic form of instruction designed to provide an apprentice with
knowledge of the theoretical and technical subjects related to his or her
trade or occupation approved by the State Apprenticeship Agency.
(B) "Related technical instruction" includes instruction
that is provided:
(i) In a classroom;
(ii) Through occupation or industrial courses;
(iii) By correspondence courses;
(iv) Through electronic media; or
(v) Through other forms of self-study; and
(10) "Sponsor" means a person, association, committee, business,
state agency, or organization operating an apprenticeship or a pre-
apprenticeship program and in whose name the apprenticeship or pre-
apprenticeship program is or is to be registered or approved.

6-52-303. Creation of State Apprenticeship Agency.
(a) There is created the State Apprenticeship Agency within the Office
of Skills Development in accordance with 29 U.S.C. § 50 and 29 C.F.R. §§ 29
and 30 to:
(1) Serve as the state registration agency for apprenticeship
programs;
03-18-2025 10:36:37 CRH201

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB390
(2) Establish rules regarding the registration of pre-
apprenticeships, apprenticeships, and apprentices; and
(3) Resolve disputes between parties to an apprenticeship
agreement.
(b)(1) The agency shall be under the direction of the Director of the
Office of Skills Development.
(2) The director may appoint a deputy director for the agency
who shall:
(A) Serve at the pleasure of the director;
(B) Manage the agency; and
(C) Perform duties as necessary to effectuate the intent
of this subchapter.
(c) By December 31, 2025, the director shall submit an application to
the Administrator of the United States Office of Apprenticeship to be
recognized as the state apprenticeship agency that shall comply with
applicable federal law.
(d) The duties created in this section are in addition to the duties
established for the Office of Skills Development under § 25-30-102.

6-52-304. Rules.
(a) The Office of Skills Development shall promulgate rules necessary
to implement this subchapter, including without limitation rules addressing
the registration, degregistration, cancellation, and reinstatement of pre-
apprenticeships, apprenticeships, and apprentices.
(b) A rule promulgated under this subchapter shall conform to the
registered apprenticeship regulations under 29 C.F.R. §§ 29 and 30.

6-52-305. Duties.
(a) The State Apprenticeship Agency shall develop a nationally
recognized state apprenticeship completion credential, as described in 29
C.F.R. § 29.5, for completing a registered apprenticeship program.
(b) The agency may register apprenticeship programs that are mandated
by state or federal law as a result of the sponsor receiving funds or
resources from the state or funds or resources from the United States
Government that require the creation of an apprenticeship program in
accordance with a federal grant administered by this state.
03-18-2025 10:36:37 CRH201

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB390
(c)(1) The Director of the Office of Skills Development may promulgate
rules on behalf of the agency as necessary to effectuate the intent of this
subchapter under § 25-30-102(a)(9).
(2) A rule promulgated under this subchapter shall conform to
the registered apprenticeship regulations under 29 C.F.R. §§ 29 and 30.
(d)(1) The director or the Deputy Director of the State Apprenticeship
Agency shall allocate state funds for the support of apprenticeship training
programs.
(2) Funding for an apprenticeship training program, in addition
to any other moneys available, shall be based on the allocation of funds to
an apprenticeship program sponsor by the agency.

6-52-306. Registration of apprenticeship program.
(a) A sponsor may apply to register an apprenticeship program with the
State Apprenticeship Agency.
(b) A registered apprenticeship program shall include without
limitation:
(1) On-the-job training from an employer;
(2) Related technical instruction; and
(3) The opportunity for an apprentice to earn a portable,
nationally-recognized industry credential.
(c) A sponsor of a registered pre-apprenticeship or registered
apprenticeship is responsible for the administration and supervision of on-
the-job training and related technical instruction for each apprentice in the
registered pre-apprenticeship or registered apprenticeship.

6-52-307. Arkansas Apprenticeship Council — Duties.
(a) There is established the Arkansas Apprenticeship Council to be an
advisory council composed of individuals representing employer organizations
and employee organizations who:
(1) Have operational experience of registered apprenticeship
programs; or
(2) Employ registered apprentices.
(b) The Governor shall appoint the members of the council who shall
have the following qualifications:
(1) Two (2) members representing employer organizations;
03-18-2025 10:36:37 CRH201

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB390
(2) Two (2) members representing employee organizations; and
(3) Three (3) members representing the public who:
(A) Have operational experience of registered
apprenticeship programs; or
(B) Employ registered apprentices.
(c) A member of the council shall serve a term of four (4) years.
(d) A vacancy shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired
portion of the vacated term.
(e) A majority of the members of the council shall represent the
construction industry.
(f) The council shall meet at least four (4) times in a fiscal year.
(g) The council shall:
(1) Advise the State Apprenticeship Agency regarding duties
under § 6-52-305;
(2) Provide community outreach and education regarding the
benefits of apprenticeship;
(3) Establish approved training methods for the operation of
apprenticeship programs in Arkansas;
(4) Establish enforcement actions for apprenticeship program
sponsors that are not operating in accordance with the rules of Arkansas
Registered Apprenticeship Programs; and
(5) Establish journeyman-to-apprentice ratios.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-55-104(b), concerning administration of
the Arkansas Construction Industry Craft Training Program, is amended to read
as follows:
(b) The program will be administered by the Office of Skills
Development in collaboration with the Arkansas Apprenticeship Coordination
Steering Committee created by § 6-52-204.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-55-105 is amended to read as follows:
6-55-105. Program plan.
In addition to the duties of the Arkansas Apprenticeship Coordination
Steering Committee Office of Skills Development contained in § 6-52-205 under
§ 6-52-305, the committee office is authorized to develop a plan for the
Arkansas Construction Industry Craft Training Program which shall include,
03-18-2025 10:36:37 CRH201

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB390
but not be limited to, including without limitation the following:
(1) Formulas and administrative procedures to be used in
requesting appropriations of state funds for the program Arkansas
Construction Industry Craft Training Program;
(2) Forms, formulas, and administrative procedures to be used in
distributing funds to construction craft training programs; and
(3) Other administrative procedures or rules as may be necessary
for the equitable and efficient operation of the program Arkansas
Construction Industry Craft Training Program.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-55-107(d), concerning the expenditure of
moneys from the Arkansas Construction Industry Craft Training Trust Fund, is
amended to read as follows:
(d) Upon the recommendation of the Arkansas Apprenticeship
Coordination Steering Committee, the The Office of Skills Development shall
expend the moneys in the fund from time to time to support the training
program prescribed in this chapter.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-55-108 is amended to read as follows:
6-55-108. Rules.
The Office of Skills Development and the Arkansas Apprenticeship
Coordination Steering Committee shall promulgate rules necessary to implement
the provisions of this chapter.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1114(b)(2), concerning the
administration of the Arkansas Construction Industry Craft Training Trust
Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The fund shall be used to support training programs set out
in The Arkansas Construction Industry Craft Training Act, § 6-55-101 et seq.,
administered by the Office of Skills Development and the Arkansas
Apprenticeship Coordination Steering Committee.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(55), concerning certain state
boards that are authorized to provide a sixty dollar stipend by majority vote
of each state board's membership, is repealed.
(55) Arkansas Apprenticeship Coordination Steering Committee;
03-18-2025 10:36:37 CRH201

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB390

/s/J. English


































03-18-2025 10:36:37 CRH201